src-fst-morphology-stems-verbs.lexc.md
umiktuq ! is closed (e.g. the chimney draft)
umŋiyaqtuq ! shaves
uniagiyaqtuq ! sled is broken
uniaġaqtuq ! sleds, travels by sled
uniuqtuq ! misses, doesn't hit (as nail, bull's eye)
unnautairuq ! is not now feverish
unniqsuqłiiruq ! promises (N)
unuŋaqtuq ! travels downriver, travels out on sea ice
upaktuġaa   ! charges him, goes after him
upaktuqtuq ! charges (of an angry animal or person)
upkuaġaa   ! closes it
upkuiġaa   ! opens it
upyakkaa ! remarks about it, wisecracks about it (K)
uqaalaruq ! talks bad language, blasphemes
uqaaqtuqtuq ! relates experiences, tells what happened (K)
uqallaktuq ! is speaking
uqamaqłuktuq ! blasphemes
uqamaqłuktuq ! is speaking badly (cursing)
uqaqtuq ! speaks, says, tells, talks
uqaqsiġiaqtuq ! is open to counsel (K)
uqaqtitaġaa   ! asked him to speak, talk
uqautigaa ! talks with him
uqautisruġnaqtuq ! is easy to talk to, amiable (K)
uqautisuġnaqtuq ! is easy to talk to, amiable (N, q)
uqayunaqtuq ! is receptive
uqayunaqtuq ! is receptive (lit. pleasant to talk with)
uqaġniġluktuq ! talks bad language, blasphemes (K)
uqaġvigigaa ! talks about it
uqigiyummiktuq ! heady, giddy, feeling light of body (N)
uqigḷiruq ! heady, giddy, feeling light of body (K)
uqqaqturuq ! talks always (i.e. like to talk), gossips (K)
uqsruqtiqtuq ! anoints, rub oil on body
uqsruuruq ! is fat (K)
uqumaiġigaa ! sucks it (something held in mouth)
urraaqtuq ! gesticulates
urriqsuġaa   ! demonstrates it, shows it by his actions
urriuqtuq ! boils meat (N)
usriḷiiruq ! loads sled (K)
utaqqiruq ! waits (N, q)
utiqtuq ! returns
utuqqauruq ! is old
uuruq ! boiled meat
uuktuq ! tests
uuksiruq ! tastes
uuktuaġaa   ! tests it, measures it
uuktuaqtuq ! tries, tests, measures
uuliktuq ! quivers, shakes, trembles
uumaruq ! is alive
uumalaaqtuq ! lively child
uumaniittuq ! it is this one here
uumiksriruq ! hates (K)
uumisaaġuraġaa   ! provokes him (K)
uunaqtuq ! is hot
uunaqtuq ! is warm
uunaqsiruq ! is becoming hot
uunaqłuktuq ! has a fever (K)
uunautiqaqtuq ! has a fever (N)
uunaġuġaa   ! it's warm
uusiruq ! is over-excited, too eager, hurries
uuyuruq ! is linked to
uvaniittuq ! is here
uviñaktuq ! is fat
uvliruq ! layover, rests between periods of travel or other activity
uvluqtusiruq ! days are getting longer (N, q)
uvluqtusriruq ! days are getting longer (K)
uvuŋaqtuq ! comes here, hither
uyummiqsuq ! is misty, blurred
uġuqtuq ! is damp
uġuuruq ! is wet from dew
uŋasiksuq ! is far
uŋasiksigiruq ! is thus far
uŋasriksuq ! is far
uŋiarriruq ! worries (N)
uŋugaa ! drives it (an animal)
uŋuluġusaaqtuq ! frightens away an attacking animal (N)
ŋraiḷiuqtuq ! fries meat

List of double verbs (to be uniqued, a handful is taken already)
In addition comes double verbs with different contlexes.
They skall be kept as-is.

aiḷaq IV
aitchu TV_vow
akima IV_vow
aktigi IV_vow
aku IV
aliuq IV
allayuaq IV
allaŋŋuq IV
alġaqsrui IV_vow
ani IV_vow
annak IV
anniqsui IV_vow
aqi TV_vow
aqpat IV
ataaqtuq IV
atanġusuk IV
atlayuaq IV
atniġñaq IV
atu TV_vow
atuq IV
atuŋaiq verb_intr_suq
aula IV_vow
aullaq IV
aullaqtit TV
aŋi IV_vow
aŋivraq IV
aŋu IV_vow
aŋu TV_vow
iglaŋaaq IV
igḷutui IV_vow
iki IV_vow
ikpiktitaq IV
iku TV_vow
ikuk IV
iḷali IV_vow
iḷaqatnik IV
iḷiqsaq IV
iḷḷati IV_vow
imŋaluk IV
iqiasuk IV
iqsi IV_vow
iñiqtiq IV
iñugik verb_intr_suq
iñuguq IV
iłuaqsi IV_vow
kalak IV
kayuq IV
killukuaq IV
kiŋiaq IV
kuvi TV_vow
maliksuktitau IV_vow
maqi IV_vow
mayuq IV
naavit TV
nagligi TV_vow
nai IV_vow
nakuu IV_vow
nallaq IV
nanġaq IV
napa IV_vow
napaaq IV
narranŋu IV_vow
naŋit IV
nigaqtuq IV
niu IV_vow
niuri IV_vow
nivak IV
niġi IV_vow
patchisigi TV_vow
piiq verb_intr_suq
piḷaiq verb_intr_suq
piḷḷuataq IV
piḷuk IV
piqpaksri IV_vow
pisaasruk IV
pisik TV
pisuaq IV
pisuk IV
pituk TV
piññaqnaq IV
piŋŋuaq IV
put IV
qai IV_vow
qanit IV
qatchaqtuq IV
qavaq IV
qaġanaq IV
qigluk IV
qimuk IV
qinnak IV
qiqiti TV_vow
qiruktaq IV
qiuri IV_vow
qiviaq IV
qivit IV
qivliq IV
qiñiyunaq IV
quliaqtuaq IV
ququula IV_vow
quviasuk IV
quya IV_vow
saat IV
saavit IV
satu TV_vow
sayaktu IV_vow
siimak IV
siḷaluk IV
siqquq IV
siqsu IV_vow
siqu IV_vow
sitquqsimanaq IV
sivunmuu IV_vow
sivutmuu IV_vow
suammak IV
supi IV_vow
taiguaq IV
tasu TV_vow
tautuk TV
tigluktuq IV
tutqik verb_intr_suq
tuttutuq IV
ui IV_vow
ukpiŋŋuaq IV
uqamaqłuk IV
uqayunaq IV
uunaq IV
This was a list of doublet verbs.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-ipk/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
